en: Artificial Food
xx: Artificial Food
cs: Umělé potraviny
da: Kunstig mad
de: Lebensmittel-Attrappen
es: Alimentos artificiales
fr: Alimentation artificielle
it: Alimenti artificiali
ja: 食品サンプル
nl: Kunstvoedsel
no: Kunstig mat
pl: Sztuczna żywność
pt: Comida artificial
ru: Искусственные пищевые продукты
sv: Artificiell mat
tr: Yapay Yiyecekler

en: Artwork
xx: Artwork
cs: Výtvarné umění
da: Illustrationer
de: Kunst
es: Obras de arte
fr: Œuvres d'art
it: Arte
ja: 美術品
nl: Kunst
no: Kunst
pl: Dzieła sztuki
pt: Obra de arte
ru: Произведения искусства
sv: Konstverk
tr: Sanatsal Çalışmalar

en: Decorative Tapestries
xx: Decorative Tapestries
cs: Ozdobné tapiserie
da: Dekorationstapeter
de: Wandteppiche
es: Tapicería decorativa
fr: Tapisseries de décoration
it: Tappezzerie decorative
ja: 装飾用タペストリー
nl: Decoratieve wandkleden
no: Dekorative veggtepper
pl: Makaty dekoracyjne
pt: Tapeçarias decorativas
ru: Гобелены
sv: Väggbonader
tr: Dekoratif Duvar Halıları

en: Posters\, Prints\, & Visual Artwork
xx: Posters\, Prints\, & Visual Artwork
cs: Plakáty\, fotografie a výtvarná díla na zeď
da: Plakater\, print og visuelle kunstværker
de: Poster & Bildende Kunst
es: Carteles\, copias y arte visual
fr: Affiches\, reproductions et œuvres graphiques
it: Poster\, stampe e opere decorative
ja: ポスター、印画、ビジュアル アート
nl: Posters\, prenten en visuele kunstwerken
no: Plakater\, trykk og visuell kunst
pl: Plakaty\, nadruki\, prace plastyczne
pt: Pôsteres\, quadros e artes visuais
ru: Плакаты\, картины\, репродукции и фотографии
sv: Affischer\, tryck och konstverk
tr: Posterler\, Baskılar ve Görsel Sanat Eserleri

en: Sculptures & Statues
xx: Sculptures & Statues
cs: Plastiky a sochy
da: Skulpturer og statuer
de: Figuren\, Skulpturen & Statuen
es: Figuras\, esculturas y estatuas
fr: Sculptures et statues
it: Statuine\, sculture e statue
ja: 彫刻・立体作品
nl: Beelden\, sculpturen en standbeelden
no: Skulpturer og statuer
pl: Rzeźby i posągi
pt: Esculturas e estátuas
ru: Статуэтки\, скульптуры и статуи
sv: Skulpturer och statyer
tr: Büstler ve Heykeller

en: Backrest Pillows
xx: Backrest Pillows
cs: Polštářová opěradla
da: Rygpuder
de: Rückenstützkissen
es: Almohadas lumbares
fr: Oreillers de soutien pour le dos
it: Cuscini dorsali
ja: 背もたれクッション
nl: Rugkussens
no: Ryggputer
pl: Poduszki pod plecy
pt: Almofada do encosto
ru: Подушки для спины
sv: Ryggstödskuddar
tr: Sırt Yastıkları

en: Baskets
xx: Baskets
cs: Koše
da: Kurve
de: Körbe
es: Cestas
fr: Paniers
it: Cesti
ja: かご・バスケット
nl: Manden
no: Kurver
pl: Koszyki
pt: Cestos
ru: Корзины
sv: Korgar
tr: Sepetler

en: Bird & Wildlife Feeder Accessories
xx: Bird & Wildlife Feeder Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke krmítkům
da: Dyrefodring – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Futterspender
es: Accesorios de comederos para pájaros
fr: Accessoires de mangeoires à oiseaux et animaux sauvages
it: Accessori mangiatoie per uccelli e piccoli animali
ja: 庭用餌箱関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor voerbakken voor vogels en wild
no: Tilbehør til fugle- og dyrematere
pl: Akcesoria do karmników ogrodowych
pt: Acessórios para alimentadores de aves
ru: Принадлежности для кормушек
sv: Tillbehör till djurmatare
tr: Kuş ve Vahşi Hayvan Yemlik Aksesuarları

en: Bird & Wildlife Feeders
xx: Bird & Wildlife Feeders
cs: Krmítka pro ptáky a jiné živočichy
da: Foderautomater til haven
de: Futterspender
es: Comederos para fauna silvestre
fr: Mangeoires pour oiseaux et animaux sauvages
it: Mangiatoie per uccelli e piccoli animali
ja: 庭用餌箱
nl: Voerbakken voor vogels en wild
no: Matestasjoner for fugler og dyr
pl: Karmniki
pt: Comedouros para aves
ru: Садовые кормушки
sv: Fågel- och djurmatare
tr: Kuş ve Vahşi Hayvan Yemlikleri

en: Bird Feeders
xx: Bird Feeders
cs: Krmítka pro ptáky
da: Foderautomater til fugle
de: Vogelfutterspender
es: Comederos para pájaros
fr: Mangeoires à oiseaux
it: Mangiatoie uccelli
ja: 鳥の餌箱
nl: Voedertafels voor vogels
no: Fuglematere
pl: Karmniki dla ptaków
pt: Comedouros para pássaros
ru: Кормушки для птиц
sv: Fågelmatare
tr: Kuş Yemlikleri

en: Butterfly Feeders
xx: Butterfly Feeders
cs: Krmítka pro motýly
da: Foderautomater til sommerfugle
de: Schmetterlingsfutterspender
es: Comederos para mariposas
fr: Mangeoires à papillons
it: Mangiatoie per farfalle
ja: 蝶の餌箱
nl: Vlindertafels
no: Sommerfuglmatere
pl: Karmniki dla motyli
pt: Comedouros para borboletas
ru: Кормушки для бабочек
sv: Fjärilsmatare
tr: Kelebek Yemlikleri

en: Squirrel Feeders
xx: Squirrel Feeders
cs: Krmítka pro veverky
da: Foderautomater til egern
de: Eichhörnchenfutterspender
es: Comederos para ardillas
fr: Mangeoires à écureuils
it: Mangiatoie per scoiattoli
ja: リスの餌箱
nl: Eekhoorntafels
no: Ekornmatere
pl: Karmniki dla wiewiórek
pt: Comedouros para esquilos
ru: Кормушки для белок
sv: Ekorrmatare
tr: Sincap Yemlikleri

en: Bird & Wildlife House Accessories
xx: Bird & Wildlife House Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke krmítkům na zahradu
da: Tilbehør til fuglehuse
de: Vogelhaus-Zubehör
es: Accesorios de casas para pájaros
fr: Accessoires pour nichoirs
it: Accessori casette per uccelli e piccoli animali
ja: 巣箱関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vogelhuisjes
no: Tilbehør til fugle- og dyrehus
pl: Akcesoria do domków dla ptaków
pt: Acessórios para casa de pássaros
ru: Принадлежности для скворечников
sv: Tillbehör till mathus
tr: Kuş Evi Aksesuarları

en: Bird & Wildlife Houses
xx: Bird & Wildlife Houses
cs: Budky pro ptáky a jiné živočichy
da: Fugle- og smådyrshuse
de: Vogel- und Tierhäuschen
es: Jaulas para pájaros y animales
fr: Cabanes à oiseaux et à animaux sauvages
it: Casette per uccelli e animali selvatici
ja: 鳥小屋、動物小屋
nl: Vogel- en dierenhuizen
no: Fugle- og dyrehus
pl: Domki dla ptaków i zwierząt
pt: Casinhas para pássaros e animais silvestres
ru: Скворечники\, домики для диких животных и насекомых
sv: Fågelholkar och hus för småvilt
tr: Kuş Yuvaları ve Vahşi Hayvan Yuvaları

en: Bat Houses
xx: Bat Houses
cs: Budky pro netopýry
da: Huse til flagermus
de: Fledermaushäuschen
es: Refugios para murciélagos
fr: Nichoirs à chauves-souris
it: Casette per pipistrelli
ja: バット ハウス
nl: Vleermuishuizen
no: Flaggermushus
pl: Domki dla nietoperzy
pt: Casinhas para morcegos
ru: Домики для летучих мышей
sv: Fladdermusholkar
tr: Yarasa Yuvaları

en: Birdhouses
xx: Birdhouses
cs: Domečky pro ptáky
da: Fuglehuse
de: Vogelhäuschen
es: Pajareras
fr: Cabanes à oiseaux
it: Casette per uccelli
ja: 鳥の巣箱
nl: Vogelhuizen
no: Fuglehus
pl: Budki dla ptaków
pt: Casinhas para pássaros
ru: Скворечники
sv: Fågelholkar
tr: Kuş Yuvaları

en: Butterfly Houses
xx: Butterfly Houses
cs: Budky pro motýly
da: Huse til sommerfugle
de: Schmetterlingshäuschen
es: Refugios para mariposas
fr: Cabanes à papillons
it: Casette per farfalle
ja: バタフライ ハウス
nl: Vlinderhuizen
no: Sommerfuglhus
pl: Domki dla motyli
pt: Casinhas para borboletas
ru: Домики для бабочек
sv: Bobox för fjärilar
tr: Kelebek Yuvaları

en: Bird Baths
xx: Bird Baths
cs: Bazénky pro ptáky
da: Fuglebade
de: Vogeltränken
es: Pilas para pájaros
fr: Abreuvoirs à oiseaux
it: Bagni per uccelli
ja: バードバス
nl: Vogelbadjes
no: Fuglebad
pl: Baseniki kąpielowe dla ptaków
pt: Piscinas para pássaros
ru: Поилки для птиц
sv: Fågelbad
tr: Kuş Banyoları

en: Bookends
xx: Bookends
cs: Zarážky na knihy
da: Bogstøtter
de: Buchstützen
es: Sujetalibros
fr: Serre-livres
it: Fermalibri
ja: ブックエンド
nl: Boekensteunen
no: Bokstøtter
pl: Podpórki na książki
pt: Suporte para livros
ru: Подставки для книг
sv: Bokstöd
tr: Kitap Destekleri

en: Cardboard Cutouts
xx: Cardboard Cutouts
cs: Kartonové postavy
da: Papfigurer
de: Kartonschablonen
es: Recortables de cartón
fr: Silhouettes en carton
it: Ritagliabili in cartone
ja: パネルボード
nl: Kartonnen figuren
no: Pappfigurer
pl: Wycinanki z kartonu
pt: Figuras de papelão em tamanho natural
ru: Картонные макеты
sv: Kartongfigurer
tr: Karton Figürler